src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Tavringer Romani language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
personal ;
demonstrative ;

LEXICON personal
miro+Pron+Pers+Nom:miro # ;
miro+Pron+Pers+Acc:miron # ;
miro+Pron+Pers+Acc:mander # ;
diro+Pron+Pers+Nom:diro # ;
diro+Pron+Pers+Acc:diron # ;
lo+Pron+Pers+Nom:lo # ;
lo+Pron+Pers+Acc:lester # ;

LEXICON demonstrative
vi_ventar_på_demonstrativa_pronomen # ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
